src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Skolt Saami noun morphology 

!! This file documents the Skolt Saami noun morphology, lexicon by lexicon.
!! cf. Mosnikoff et al 2020: 356
!! the notions of vowels in 9 rows A–I, and 5 columns
!! |(A)|a|ä|aʹ|äʹ|äʹ|
!! |(B)|õ|â|õʹ|âʹ|âʹ|
!! |(C)|u|o|uʹ|oʹ|uʹ|
!! |(D)|o|å|oʹ|åʹ|åʹ|
!! |(E)|i|e|iʹ|eʹ|eʹ|
!! |(F)|uõ|uâ|uõʹ|ueʹ (<*uâʹ)| ueʹ|
!! |(G)|uå|uä|ueʹ (<*uåʹ)|uäʹ/uẹʹ|uẹ /uäʹ|
!! |(H)|iõ|eâ|iõʹ|ieʹ (<*eâʹ)|ieʹ (<*eâʹ)|
!! |(I)|iâ|eä|ieʹ (<*iâʹ)|eäʹ/uẹʹ|eäʹ/uẹʹ|

!! F4,F5, G4, G5, H4, H5, I4, I5 are problematic, and for this reason they are not given as in the book,
!! diphthong + XX and YX -> uẹʹ, iẹʹ
!! diphthong + XˈX and YXX -> uäʹ, eäʹ
!! column 1 is high; column 2 is low; column 3 is high with soft sign;
!! column 4 represents (vowel + XˈX and YXX) context found in +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3 (cf. Mosnikoff et al 2020)
!! column 5 is low with monophthongs and analogically low with diphthongs (see Rueter, 2025 )

!! ## Unclassified words

LEXICON N_ !!= * @CODE@ FOR (STILL) UNCLASSIFIED INCOMING NOUNS.
+Sg+Nom: #; ! TODO: all cases

!testing with make  HFST_LEXC_FLAGS=--Werror
!NMN_PIGS;

LEXICON N_SG-NOM-ORPHAN
! For special +Sg+Nom when orphan from paradigm
+Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON N_SG-NOM-WITH-CMP
! For allowing compounding even though a word lacks full paradigm
+Sg+Nom: SG-NOM ;

!! IRREGULAR NOUN nijdd
LEXICON N_NIJDD !!= * @CODE@ nijdd:ni
!!! inflection_type="1"
: NMN_NIJDD ;

LEXICON	NMN_NIJDD	!!= * @CODE@ nijdd:ni
!! * Yaml: **N-nijdd**
!! NMN_1Â_IJCC
:jdd SG-NOM ;			!!= * @CODE@ nijdd
:jdd%>â ESS/PAR ; 	  		!!= * @CODE@ nijddân, nijddâd
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
:{ʹØ}jdd%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		!!= * @CODE@ niʹjdde
!! strong_geminate, long_vowel
:õđ SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@ niõđ
:õđ%>â SG-LOC ;		!!= * @CODE@ niõđâst
:õđ SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	!!= * @CODE@ niõđ, niõđid, niõđid, niõđin, niõđivuiʹm, niõđitaa

+Der+Der/Dimin+N:õđ N_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ niõđ-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:õ{ʹØ}đ%^PAL N_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ niõʹđ-

:jdd HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:õđ HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
:õđ HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;
:õđ SG-LOC-PX ;
:õđ HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

+Err/GenreLeudd:õđâ SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;     !!= * @CODE@ niõđ Leudd 2018-09-20
+Err/GenreLeudd:õđâ SG-COM_N ; !!= * @CODE@ Leudd 2018-09-20


! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: nijdd #
!!€ nijdd:  	 nijdd+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ niõđ: 	 nijdd+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ niõđ: 	 nijdd+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ niʹjdde: 	 nijdd+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ niõđâst: 	 nijdd+N+Sg+Loc
!!€ niõđstad: 	 nijdd+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1
!!€ niõđin: 	 nijdd+N+Sg+Com
!!€ nijddân: 	 nijdd+N+Ess
!!€ nijddâd: 	 nijdd+N+Par
!!€ niõđtaa: 	 nijdd+N+Sg+Abe
!!€ niõđ:	 nijdd+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ niõđi: 	 nijdd+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ niõđid: 	 nijdd+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ niõđid: 	 nijdd+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ niõđin: 	 nijdd+N+Pl+Loc
!!€ niõđivuiʹm:  nijdd+N+Pl+Com
!!€ niõđitaa: 	 nijdd+N+Pl+Abe
!!€ niõđâž:      nijdd+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ niõʹđe:      nijdd+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen



!! CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON N_1Â_VCC !!= * @CODE@ papp:pa%^1VOW{ʹØ}pp
!!! inflection_type="1"
!! similar_to: N_PESS
 NMN_1Â_VCC ;
LEXICON NMN_1Â_VCC
!! pa{a0}{ʹ0}{p0}p
!! V{V0}{ʹ0}{C0}C
!! Sg_Nom:
!! high-vowel=yes
!! monophthong=yes
!! long-vowel=yes
!! palatalization=no
!! consonantism=quant-gem
!! long-consonant=yes

!!! pos="nominal"
!!! syll_count-in-Sg_Nom="1"
!!! stem-ends-in="consonant"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc="â"
!!! stem_with_gradation="yes" 
!! 1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|geminate" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|geminate" 

! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: geminate
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: no
! strong_grade:	geminate
! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! ## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! ## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! * Yaml: **N-papp**
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel
: SG-NOM ;			!!= * @CODE@ papp
:%>â ESS/PAR ; 	  		!!= * @CODE@ pappân, pappâd
: A_DER/SAZH_Y ;

!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		!!= * @CODE@ paʹppe
:%^PAL N2A_LUOQSSI ;		!!= * @CODE@ N»A: paʹppi

!! strong_geminate, long_vowel
:%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@ paapp
:%^V2VV%>â SG-LOC ;		!!= * @CODE@ paappâst
:%^V2VV SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	!!= * @CODE@ paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa
:%^V2VV A_DER/LAZH ;

+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paapp-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paaʹpp-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL-ALLEGRO ;
!! papp+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
!! paʹpstes

HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ; !! e.g. 
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ; !! e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
:%^CC2CAllegro SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ; !! e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg3 pp:p papstes
 HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

LEXICON N_1Â_VCC_PL
+Cmp/SgNom: R ;          !!= * @CODE@ papp
:%^V2VV PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ paapp
:%^V2VV PL-OBL ;      !!= * @CODE@ paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa
:%>â ESS/PAR ;                  !!= * @CODE@ pappân, pappâd
: HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN_PL ;
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_PL ;
: HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-ESS ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: papp # 
!!€ papp:   	 papp+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ paapp: 	 papp+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ paapp: 	 papp+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ paʹppe: 	 papp+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ paappâst: 	 papp+N+Sg+Loc
!!€ papstan: 	 papp+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1
!!€ paappstan: 	 papp+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1
!!€ paappin: 	 papp+N+Sg+Com
!!€ pappân: 	 papp+N+Ess
!!€ pappâd: 	 papp+N+Par
!!€ paapptaa: 	 papp+N+Sg+Abe
!!€ paapp: 	 papp+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ paappi: 	 papp+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ paappid: 	 papp+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ paappid: 	 papp+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ paappin: 	 papp+N+Pl+Loc
!!€ paappivuiʹm: papp+N+Pl+Com
!!€ paappitaa: 	 papp+N+Pl+Abe
!!€ paappâž: 	 papp+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ paaʹppe: 	 papp+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen

LEXICON N_1Â_VKK
 NMN_1Â_VKK ;
LEXICON NMN_1Â_VKK
!! * Yaml: **N-pakk**
!! strong_geminate, short_vowel
: SG-NOM ;			!!= * @CODE@ papp
:%>â ESS/PAR ; 	  		!!= * @CODE@ pappân, pappâd
: A_DER/SAZH_Y ;

!! strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
:%^PAL%^PALK%>e SG-ILL ;		!!= * @CODE@ paʹppe
:%^PAL%^PALK N2A_LUOQSSI ;		!!= * @CODE@ N»A: paʹppi

!! strong_geminate, long_vowel
:%^V2VV SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@ paapp
:%^V2VV%>â SG-LOC ;		!!= * @CODE@ paappâst
:%^V2VV SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	!!= * @CODE@ paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa
:%^V2VV A_DER/LAZH ;

+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paapp-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^PALK N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ paaʹpp-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro%^PALK N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL-ALLEGRO ;
!! papp+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
!! paʹpstes

HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ; !! e.g. 
:%^V2VV HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ; !! e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
:%^CC2CAllegro SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ; !! e.g. +Sg+Loc+PxSg3 pp:p papstes
 HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

LEXICON N_1Â_VYKK_errorth !!= * @CODE@
+Err/Orth: N_1Â_VYKK ;
LEXICON N_1Â_VYKK !!= * @CODE@ algg:a%^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg
 NMN_1Â_VYKK ;
LEXICON NMN_1Â_VYKK
!! * Yaml: **N-algg**
!! 
: SG-NOM ;	    				!!= * @CODE@ põrtt
: A_DER/SAZH_Y ;

:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		!!= * @CODE@ põõrt
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;		!!= * @CODE@ põõrt
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A_DER/LAZH ;
:%^PAL%^PALK%>e SG-ILL ;		      		!!= * @CODE@ põʹrtte
:%^PAL%^PALK N2A_LUOQSSI ;		      	!!= * @CODE@ põʹrtti
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%>â SG-LOC ;			!!= * @CODE@ põõrtâst
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-COM_IN ;			!!= * @CODE@ põõrtin
:%>â ESS/PAR ; 		  			!!= * @CODE@ põrttân
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;			!!= * @CODE@ põõrti

+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ põõrt-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ põõʹrt-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL%^YXX2YX%^PALK N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL-ALLEGRO ;

HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;
:%^YXX2YX SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;
: HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;


LEXICON N_1Â_VYXX !!= * @CODE@ põrtt:põ%^1VOW{ʹØ}rtt
!!! inflection_type="1"
 NMN_1Â_VYXX ;
LEXICON NMN_1Â_VYXX
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_xyy
!! similar_to: N_TAALKYS, N_KOONTYR
!!! pos="nominal"
!!! syll_count-in-Sg_Nom="1"
!!! stem-ends-in="consonant"
!!! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc="â"
!!! stem_with_gradation="yes" 
!! 1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|long_cluster" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|short_cluster" 

! foot: 2syll
! diphthong: no
! vowel_shift: no
! consonant: cluster
! gradation: yes2
! weak_grade: short
! strong_grade: long
! stem_vowel-in-Sg_Loc: âst
! Sg.Ill: palatalization-AND-e
!! ## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
!! ## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
!!  â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! ## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
!! ## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!!  Palatalized: Sg.Ill
!!  Not Palatalized: ELSE
!!    Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! ## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!!  Strong grade: Sg.Ill
!!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! ## FORMS
!! * Yaml: **N-algg**
!! 
: SG-NOM ;	    				!!= * @CODE@ põrtt
: A_DER/SAZH_Y ;

:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;		!!= * @CODE@ põõrt
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;		!!= * @CODE@ põõrt
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX A_DER/LAZH ;
:%^PAL%>e SG-ILL ;		      		!!= * @CODE@ põʹrtte
:%^PAL N2A_LUOQSSI ;		      	!!= * @CODE@ põʹrtti
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX%>â SG-LOC ;			!!= * @CODE@ põõrtâst
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX SG-COM_IN ;			!!= * @CODE@ põõrtin
:%>â ESS/PAR ; 		  			!!= * @CODE@ põrttân
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;			!!= * @CODE@ põõrti

+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ põõrt-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^V2VV%^PAL%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ põõʹrt-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL%^YXX2YX N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ põʹrt-

HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;
:%^YXX2YX SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;
: HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

LEXICON N_1Â_VYKK_PL !!= * @CODE@ aalǥ:algg
+Cmp/SgNom: R ;                           !!= * @CODE@ põrtt
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;                !!= * @CODE@ põõrt
:%>â ESS/PAR ;                                  !!= * @CODE@ põrttân
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;                        !!= * @CODE@ põõrti

LEXICON N_1Â_VYXX_PL !!= * @CODE@ põõrt:põrtt
+Cmp/SgNom: R ;                           !!= * @CODE@ põrtt
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-NOM ;                !!= * @CODE@ põõrt
:%>â ESS/PAR ;                                  !!= * @CODE@ põrttân
:%^V2VV%^YXX2YX PL-OBL ;                        !!= * @CODE@ põõrti

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: algg # 
!!€ algg:    	 algg+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ aalǥ:	 algg+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ aalǥ: 	 algg+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ aʹlǧǧe: 	 algg+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ aalǥâst: 	 algg+N+Sg+Loc
!!€ alǥstan: 	 algg+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1
!!€ aalǥstan: 	 algg+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1
!!€ aalǥin: 	 algg+N+Sg+Com
!!€ alggân: 	 algg+N+Ess
!!€ alggâd: 	 algg+N+Par
!!€ alǥtaa: 	 algg+N+Sg+Abe
!!€ aalǥ: 	 algg+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ aalǥi: 	 algg+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ aalǥid: 	 algg+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ aalǥid: 	 algg+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ aalǥin: 	 algg+N+Pl+Loc
!!€ aalǥivuiʹm:  algg+N+Pl+Com
!!€ aalǥitaa: 	 algg+N+Pl+Abe
!!€ aalǥâž: 	 algg+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ aaʹlje: 	 algg+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen

!!!
LEXICON N_1Â_VUKK !!= * @CODE@ joukk:jo%^1VOWu{ʹØ}kk
 NMN_1Â_VUKK ;
